Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 3 First Offenders

Law reviews.

For note, “Bailing on Bail:
The Unconstitutionality of Fixed, Monetary Bail Systems and Their Continued Use Throughout the United States,”
see 52 Ga. L. Rev. 985 (2018).

For article, “The Meaning of a Misdemeanor in a Post-Ferguson World:
Evaluating the Reliability of Prior Conviction Evidence,” see 54 Ga. L. Rev. 927 (2020).

42-8-60.
Probation prior to adjudication of guilt; violation of probation; review of criminal record by judge.

When a defendant has not been previously convicted of a felony, the court may, upon a guilty verdict or plea of guilty or nolo contendere and before an adjudication of guilt, without entering a judgment of guilt and with the consent of the defendant, defer further proceedings and:

Place the defendant on probation; or

Sentence the defendant to a term of confinement.

The court shall not sentence a defendant under the provisions of this article unless the court has reviewed the defendant’s criminal record as such is on file with the Georgia Crime Information Center.

When a court imposes a sentence pursuant to this article, it:

Shall state in its sentencing order the prospective effective date of the defendant being exonerated of guilt and discharged as a matter of law, assuming the defendant successfully complies with its sentencing order, provided that such date may not have taken into account the awarding of credit for time served in custody; and

May limit access to certain information as provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 42-8-62.1.

The court may enter an adjudication of guilt and proceed to sentence the defendant as otherwise provided by law when the:

Defendant violates the terms of his or her first offender probation;

Defendant is convicted for another crime during the period of his or her first offender sentence; or

Court determines that the defendant is or was not eligible for first offender sentencing under this article.

A defendant sentenced pursuant to this article shall be exonerated of guilt and shall stand discharged as a matter of law as soon as the defendant:

Completes the terms of his or her probation, which shall include the expiration of the sentence by virtue of the time frame of the sentence passing, provided that such sentence has not otherwise been tolled or suspended;

Is released by the court under Code Section 42-8-37, 42-8-103, or 42-8-103.1 prior to the termination of the period of his or her probation; or

Is released from confinement and parole, provided that the defendant is not serving a split sentence.

If the defendant is serving a first offender probated sentence, under active probation supervision or without supervision, within 30 days of such defendant completing active probation supervision, it shall be the duty of the Department of Community Supervision to notify, in writing, the clerk of court for the jurisdiction of the court which imposed the first offender sentence of such completion.

If the defendant is serving a first offender probated sentence, under active probation supervision or without supervision, within 30 days of such defendant completing the term of probation or being released by the court prior to the termination of the period of probation, it shall be the duty of the Department of Community Supervision or entity or governing authority that is providing probation supervision services pursuant to Article 6 of this chapter, as applicable, to notify, in writing, the clerk of court for the jurisdiction of the court which imposed the first offender sentence of such completion or release.

If the defendant is serving a first offender probated sentence pursuant to Article 6 of this chapter, under active probation supervision or without supervision, within 30 days of such defendant completing the term of probation or being released by the court prior to the termination of the period of probation, it shall be the duty of the entity or governing authority that is providing probation supervision services pursuant to Article 6 of this chapter to notify, in writing, the clerk of court for the jurisdiction of the court which imposed the first offender sentence of such completion or release.

If the defendant is not serving a first offender split sentence but is under parole supervision, within 30 days of such defendant completing the term of parole, it shall be the duty of the Department of Community Supervision to notify, in writing, the clerk of court for the jurisdiction of the court which imposed the first offender sentence of such completion.

If the defendant was sentenced only to imprisonment as a first offender and not granted parole, within 30 days of such defendant being released from confinement, it shall be the duty of the Department of Corrections to notify, in writing, the clerk of court for the jurisdiction of the court which imposed the first offender sentence of such release.

If the Department of Community Supervision fails to notify the clerk of court as provided in paragraph (2) or (4) of subsection (f) of this Code section, the entity or governing authority that is providing probation supervision services pursuant to Article 6 of this chapter fails to notify the clerk of court as provided in paragraph (2) or (3) of subsection (f) of this Code section, the Department of Corrections fails to notify the clerk of court as provided in paragraph (5) of subsection (f) of this Code section, or the state does not seek to have a first offender adjudicated guilty during the term of the first offender’s sentence and the first offender’s sentence has not otherwise been tolled or suspended, then the defendant shall be exonerated of guilt and shall stand discharged as a matter of law.

When the clerk of court receives for filing an order of exoneration of guilt and discharge or is notified by the Georgia Crime Information Center that a defendant has completed his or her first offender sentence or was discharged pursuant to subsection (g) of this Code section, it shall be the duty of the clerk of court to enter on the criminal docket, accusation or indictment, sentencing order, and any subsequent order modifying the original first offender sentencing order within 30 days of the receipt of such order or notification the following:

“Discharge filed completely exonerates the defendant of any criminal purpose and shall not affect any of his or her civil rights or liberties, except for registration requirements under the state sexual offender registry and except with regard to employment as specified in Code Section 42-8-63.1; and the defendant shall not be considered to have a criminal conviction. O.C.G.A. 42-8-60.”

The entry required by paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be written or stamped in red ink, dated, and signed by the individual making such entry; provided, however, that, if the criminal docket or court records are maintained electronically or using computer printouts, microfilm, or similar means, such entry shall be underscored, boldface, or made in a similar conspicuous manner, shall be dated, and shall include the name of the individual making such entry on the criminal docket, accusation or indictment, sentencing order, and any subsequent order modifying the original first offender sentencing order.

Except for the registration requirements under the state sexual offender registry and except as otherwise provided in Code Section 42-8-63.1, the first offender exoneration of guilt and discharge shall completely exonerate the defendant of any criminal purpose and shall not affect any of his or her civil rights or liberties, and the defendant shall not be considered to have a criminal conviction.

The court shall not sentence a defendant under the provisions of this article who has been found guilty of or entered a plea of guilty or a plea of nolo contendere for:

A serious violent felony as such term is defined in Code Section 17-10-6.1;

A sexual offense as such term is defined in Code Section 17-10-6.2;

Trafficking of persons for labor or sexual servitude as prohibited by Code Section 16-5-46;

Neglecting disabled adults, elder persons, or residents as prohibited by Code Section 16-5-101;

Exploitation and intimidation of disabled adults, elder persons, and residents as prohibited by Code Section 16-5-102;

Sexual exploitation of a minor as prohibited by Code Section 16-12-100;

Electronically furnishing obscene material to a minor as prohibited by Code Section 16-12-100.1;

Computer pornography and child exploitation as prohibited by Code Section 16-12-100.2;

Any of the following offenses when such offense is committed against a law enforcement officer while such officer is engaged in the performance of his or her official duties:

Aggravated assault in violation of Code Section 16-5-21;

Aggravated battery in violation of Code Section 16-5-24; or

Obstruction of a law enforcement officer in violation of subsection (b) of Code Section 16-10-24, if such violation results in serious physical harm or injury to such officer.

As used in this paragraph, the term “law enforcement officer” means:

A peace officer as such term is defined in paragraph (8) of Code Section 35-8-2;

A law enforcement officer of the United States government;

An individual employed as a campus police officer or school security officer;

A game warden; and

A jail officer employed at a county or municipal jail; or

Driving under the influence as prohibited by Code Section 40-6-391.

When a defendant has not been previously convicted of a felony, the court may, after an adjudication of guilt, sentence the defendant pursuant to this article as provided in Code Section 42-8-66 or modify a sentence as provided in subsection (f) of Code Section 17-10-1 so as to allow a sentence pursuant to this article.

A defendant shall not avail himself or herself of this article on more than one occasion.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 324, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1807, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 380, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 218, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 379, § 26/HB 1059; Ga. L. 2012, p. 172, § 1/SB 231; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 6A-1/SB 367; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, deleted “or” at the end of paragraph (d)(4); substituted “; or” for a period at the end of paragraph (d)(5); and added paragraph (d)(6).

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, rewrote this Code section.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “game warden” for “conservation ranger” in division (j)(9)(B)(iv).

Cross references.

Probation for first offenders of laws relating to possession of narcotic drugs, marijuana, or other substances, §

16-13-2

.

Punishment of misdemeanor first offenders, §

17-10-3

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, “plea of guilty or” was substituted for “plea of guilty of” in the introductory language of subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 379, § 30/HB 1059, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The provisions of this Act shall not affect or abate the status as a crime of any such act or omission which occurred prior to the effective date of the Act repealing, repealing and reenacting, or amending such law, nor shall the prosecution of such crime be abated as a result of such repeal, repeal and reenactment, or amendment.” This Act became effective July 1, 2006.

Law reviews.

For article on recidivism and convictions based on nolo contendere pleas, see 13 Ga. L. Rev. 723 (1979).

For article on the effect of nolo contendere plea on conviction, see 13 Ga. L. Rev. 723 (1979).

For annual survey of criminal law and procedure, see 41 Mercer L. Rev. 115 (1989).

For annual survey article on evidence, see 50 Mercer L. Rev. 229 (1998).

For annual survey of criminal law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 113 (2005).

For annual survey of evidence law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 187 (2005).

For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 11 (2006).

For annual survey of criminal law, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 83 (2006).

For article, “No Second Chances: Immigration Consequences of Criminal Charges,” see 13 Ga. St. B.J. 26 (2007).

For note, “Padilla v. Kentucky:
The Criminal Defense Attorney’s Obligation to Warn of Immigration Consequences of Criminal Conviction,” see 29 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 891 (2012).

For annual survey of criminal law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 31 (2015).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-8-61.
Defendant to be informed of eligibility for sentencing as first offender.

When a defendant is represented by an attorney, his or her attorney shall be responsible for informing the defendant as to his or her eligibility for sentencing as a first offender. When a defendant is pro se, the court shall inquire as to the defendant’s interest in entering a plea pursuant to the terms of this article. If the defendant expresses a desire to be sentenced as a first offender, the court shall ask the prosecuting attorney or probation official if the defendant is eligible for sentencing as a first offender. When imposing a sentence, the court shall ensure that, if a defendant is sentenced as a first offender, he or she is made aware of the consequences of entering a first offender plea pursuant to the terms of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 324, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1807, § 2; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-74/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 6A-1/SB 367.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “The defendant shall be informed of the terms of this article at the time of imposition of sentence.” See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 6A-1/SB 367, effective July 1, 2016, reenacted this Code section without change.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-8-62.
Duty of clerk to transfer information.

When an individual is placed on probation or in confinement under this article, within 30 days of the filing of such sentence, the clerk of court shall transmit a record of the first offender sentence to the Georgia Crime Information Center. The clerk shall also transmit any subsequent order or notification regarding a first offender’s sentence, including, but not limited to, notification that the defendant completed active probation supervision, was released early from probation supervision, or completed the term of probation, notification that the defendant completed the term of prison or parole, an order revoking a first offender sentence, an order of exoneration of guilt and discharge, and tolling orders, to the Georgia Crime Information Center within 30 days of receiving such order for filing or notification.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 324, § 2; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1621, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1807, § 3; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 442, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 735, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1004, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 840, § 4; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 6A-1/SB 367.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, rewrote this Code section.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment of this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 227 (2001).

For note on the 2003 amendment to this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 179 (2003).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-8-62.1.
Limiting public access to first offender status; petitioning; sealing record.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Criminal history record information” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 35-3-30.

“Prosecuting attorney” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 35-3-37.

“Restrict,” “restricted,” or “restriction” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 35-3-37.

At the time of sentencing, or during the term of a sentence that was imposed before July 1, 2016, the defendant may seek to limit public access to his or her first offender sentencing information, and the court may, in its discretion, order any of the following:

Restrict dissemination of the defendant’s first offender records;

The criminal file, docket books, criminal minutes, final record, all other records of the court, and the defendant’s criminal history record information in the custody of the clerk of court, including within any index, be sealed and unavailable to the public; and

Law enforcement agencies, jails, or detention centers to restrict the defendant’s criminal history record information of arrest, including any fingerprints or photographs taken in conjunction with such arrest.

When considering the defendant’s request under this subsection, the court shall weigh the public’s interest in the defendant’s criminal history record information being publicly available and the harm to the defendant’s privacy and issue written findings of fact thereupon.

The court shall specify the date that such prohibited dissemination, sealing, and restrictions will take effect.

An individual who has been exonerated of guilt and discharged pursuant to this article, including those individuals exonerated of guilt and discharged prior to July 1, 2016, may petition the court that granted such discharge for an order to seal and make unavailable to the public the criminal file, docket books, criminal minutes, final record, all other records of the court, and the defendant’s criminal history record information in the custody of the clerk of court, including within any index. Notice of such petition shall be sent to the clerk of court and the prosecuting attorney. A notice sent by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery shall be sufficient notice.

Within 90 days of the filing of a petition pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section, the court shall order the criminal file, docket books, criminal minutes, final record, all other records of the court, and the defendant’s criminal history record information in the custody of the clerk of court, including within any index, to be sealed and made unavailable to the public if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that:

An exoneration of guilt and discharge has been granted pursuant to this article; and

The harm otherwise resulting to the privacy of the individual outweighs the public interest in the criminal history record information being publicly available.

Within 60 days of the filing of the court’s order under subsection (d) of this Code section, the clerk of court shall cause every document in connection with such individual’s case, physical or electronic, in its custody, possession, or control to be sealed.

When a court orders sealing of court records under subsection (d) of this Code section, the court may also order that records maintained by law enforcement agencies, jails, and detention centers be restricted and unavailable to the public. Such entities shall comply with such restriction within 30 days of receiving a copy of such order.

Information sealed or restricted pursuant to this Code section shall always be available for inspection, copying, and use:

As provided in subsection (c) of Code Section 42-8-65;

By the Judicial Qualifications Commission;

By a prosecuting attorney or public defender who submits a sworn affidavit to the clerk of court that attests that such information is relevant to a criminal proceeding;

Pursuant to a court order; and

By an individual who is the subject of sealed court files or restricted criminal history record information upon court order.

The confidentiality of such information shall be maintained insofar as practical.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-62.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 6A-1/SB 367; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 2-14/SB 407.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2016.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, inserted “or during the term of a sentence that was imposed before July 1, 2016,” near the beginning of paragraph (b)(1).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 enactment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-8-63.
Effect of discharge under article on eligibility for employment or appointment to office.

Except as provided in Code Section 42-8-63.1, a discharge under this article is not a conviction of a crime under the laws of this state and shall not be used to disqualify an individual in any application for employment or appointment to office in either the public or private sector.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1621, § 2; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 6A-1/SB 367.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “provided in Code Section 42-8-63.1,” for “otherwise provided in this article,” near the beginning and substituted “shall not be used to disqualify an individual” for “may not be used to disqualify a person” in the middle.

Law reviews.

For article, “Labor and Employment Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 349 (2001).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-8-63.1.
Discharges disqualifying individuals from employment.

A discharge under this article may be used to disqualify an individual for employment if the individual was discharged under this article between July 1, 2004, and June 30, 2016, and:

The employment is with a public school, private school, child welfare agency, or a person or entity that provides day care for minor children or after-school care for minor children and the individual who is the subject of the inquiry was prosecuted for the offense of child molestation, sexual battery, enticing a child for indecent purposes, sexual exploitation of a child, pimping, pandering, or incest;

The employment is with a long-term care facility as defined in Code Section 31-8-51 or a person or entity that offers day care for elderly persons and the individual who is the subject of the inquiry was prosecuted for the offense of sexual battery, incest, pimping, or pandering or a violation of Article 8 of Chapter 5 of Title 16; or

The request for information is an inquiry about an individual who has applied for employment with a facility as defined in Code Section 37-3-1 or 37-4-2 that provides services to individuals who are mentally ill as defined in Code Section 37-1-1 or developmentally disabled as defined in Code Section 37-1-1 and the individual who is the subject of the inquiry was prosecuted for the offense of sexual battery, incest, pimping, or pandering.

A discharge under this article may be used to disqualify an individual for employment if the individual was discharged under this article on or after July 1, 2016, and:

The employment is with a public school, private school, child welfare agency, or a person or entity that provides day care for minor children or after-school care for minor children and the individual who is the subject of the inquiry was prosecuted for a violation of Title 16 in Article 5 of Chapter 5, Chapter 6, or Part 2 or 3 of Article 3 of Chapter 12;

The employment is with a long-term care facility as defined in Code Section 31-8-51 or with a person or entity that offers day care for elderly persons and the individual who is the subject of the inquiry was prosecuted for a violation of Title 16 in Article 5 or 8 of Chapter 5; or

The request for information is an inquiry about an individual who has applied for employment with a facility as defined in Code Section 37-3-1 or 37-4-2 that provides services to individuals who are mentally ill as defined in Code Section 37-1-1 or developmentally disabled as defined in Code Section 37-1-1 and the individual who is the subject of the inquiry was prosecuted for a violation of Title 16 in Article 8 of Chapter 5 or Chapter 6.

Any discharge under this article may be used to disqualify an individual from acquiring or maintaining a peace officer certification as provided for in Chapter 8 of Title 35, may disqualify an individual from employment in a certified position with a law enforcement unit, and may disqualify an individual from employment with the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council when the discharge under this article pertained to a felony offense or a crime involving moral turpitude.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-63.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 840, § 5; Ga. L. 2006, p. 164, § 2/HB 1335; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-25/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 227, § 27/SB 178; Ga. L. 2013, p. 524, § 3-7/HB 78; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 6A-1/SB 367; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 42/SB 429.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in paragraph (a)(3), substituted “long-term care facility as defined in Code Section 31-8-51” for “nursing home, assisted living community, personal care home,” near the beginning, and substituted “Article 8 of Chapter 5 of Title 16” for “Code Section 30-5-8” near the end.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, rewrote this Code section.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “after-school care” for “after school care” in paragraphs (a)(1) and (b)(1).

Cross references.

Circumstances when exonerated first offender’s criminal record may be disclosed, §

35-3-34.1

.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2003 enactment of this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 179 (2003).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-8-64.
Appeal of sentence imposed under article.

A defendant sentenced pursuant to this article shall have the right to appeal in the same manner and with the same scope and same effect as if a judgment of conviction had been entered and appealed from.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 324, § 5; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 6A-1/SB 367.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 6A-1/SB 367, effective July 1, 2016, reenacted this Code section without change.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-8-65.
Use of prior finding of guilt in subsequent prosecutions; modification of records.

If otherwise allowable by law, in a subsequent prosecution of the defendant for another offense, when a defendant has not been exonerated of guilt and discharged, the prior finding of guilt may be pleaded and proven as if an adjudication of guilt had been entered and relief had not been granted pursuant to this article.

The records of the Georgia Crime Information Center showing treatment as a first offender shall be modified only when a court of competent jurisdiction enters:

An adjudication of guilt for the offense for which the offender has been sentenced as a first offender;

An order modifying the sentence originally imposed; or

An order correcting an exoneration of guilt and discharge entered pursuant to subsection (g) of Code Section 42-8-60.

Any individual who is sentenced pursuant to subsection (a) or (k) of Code Section 42-8-60 shall not be deemed to have been convicted during such sentence, and records thereof shall only be disseminated by the Georgia Crime Information Center:

To criminal justice agencies, as such term is defined in Code Section 35-3-30;

As authorized by subsection (c) of Code Section 35-3-37; and

As authorized by subparagraph (a)(1)(B) of Code Sections 35-3-34 and 35-3-35.

If a court of competent jurisdiction adjudicates the defendant guilty while such defendant is serving a first offender sentence, such records may be disseminated by the Georgia Crime Information Center as provided in Code Sections 35-3-34 and 35-3-35.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 324, § 4; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1621, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1807, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 31; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 380, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 735, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 42; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 6A-1/SB 367.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, rewrote this Code section.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 380 cited “Code Section 40-8-60” in present subsection (c). Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, this has been changed to “Code Section 42-8-60.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 380, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provided as follows: “Subsection (d) [now subsection (c)] of Code Section 42-8-65 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated enacted by Section 2 of this Act shall be repealed upon the ratification of an amendment to the Constitution extending the jurisdiction of the State Board of Pardons and Paroles to consider cases covered by Code Section 42-8-60.” As of May 1, 2018, no vote had been taken on such a constitutional amendment.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 380, § 3, as amended by Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 2-19/SB 407, provides: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” Ga. L. 1985, p. 380 was signed by the Governor and became law on March 20, 1985.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-8-66.
Petition for exoneration and discharge; hearing; retroactive grant of first offender status; no filing fee.

An individual who qualified for sentencing pursuant to this article but who was not informed of his or her eligibility for first offender treatment may, with the consent of the prosecuting attorney, petition the court in which he or she was convicted for exoneration of guilt and discharge pursuant to this article.

An individual who was sentenced between March 18, 1968, and October 31, 1982, to a period of incarceration not exceeding one year but who would otherwise have qualified for sentencing pursuant to this article may, with the consent of the prosecuting attorney, petition the court in which he or she was convicted for exoneration of guilt and discharge pursuant to this article.

The court shall hold a hearing on the petition if requested by the petitioner or prosecuting attorney or desired by the court.

In considering a petition pursuant to this Code section, the court may consider any:

Evidence introduced by the petitioner;

Evidence introduced by the prosecuting attorney; and

Other relevant evidence.

The court may issue an order retroactively granting first offender treatment and discharge the defendant pursuant to this article if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant was eligible for sentencing under the terms of this article at the time he or she was originally sentenced or that he or she qualifies for sentencing under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section and the ends of justice and the welfare of society are served by granting such petition.

The court shall send a copy of any order issued pursuant to this Code section to the petitioner, the prosecuting attorney, the Georgia Crime Information Center, and the Department of Driver Services. The Georgia Crime Information Center and the Department of Driver Services shall modify their records accordingly.

This Code section shall not apply to a sentence that may be modified pursuant to subsection (f) of Code Section 17-10-1.

This Code section shall apply to any sentence entered on or after March 18, 1968.

There shall be no filing fee charged for a petition filed pursuant to this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-66

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 180, § 3; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-75/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 6A-1/SB 367; Ga. L. 2017, p. 566, § 1/HB 261; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 2-15/SB 407.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “The provisions of this article shall not apply to any person who is convicted of a serious violent felony as defined in subsection (a) of Code Section 17-10-6.1.” See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in subsection (a), substituted “exoneration of guilt and discharge” for “discharge and exoneration”; and, in subsection (e), substituted “the Georgia Crime Information Center, and the Department of Driver Services. The Georgia Crime Information Center and the Department of Driver Services shall modify their” for “and the Georgia Bureau of Investigation. The Georgia Bureau of Investigation shall modify its” near the end.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, designated the existing provisions of subsection (a) as paragraph (a)(1); added paragraph (a)(2); inserted “or that he or she qualifies for sentencing under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section” in the middle of subsection (d); and added subsection (g).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, deleted “superior” preceding “court”, and deleted “in the county” preceding “in which he or she” in the middle of paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(2); and added subsection (h).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 180, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides:
“The General Assembly declares and finds: (1) That the ‘Sentence Reform Act of 1994,’ approved April 20, 1994 (Ga. L. 1994, p. 1959), provided that persons convicted of one of seven serious violent felonies shall serve minimum mandatory terms of imprisonment which shall not otherwise be suspended, stayed, probated, deferred, or withheld by the sentencing court; (2) That in

State v. Allmond

,

225 Ga. App. 509

(1997), the Georgia Court of Appeals held, notwithstanding the ‘Sentence Reform Act of 1994,’ that the provisions of the First Offender Act would still be available to the sentencing court, which would mean that a person who committed a serious violent felony could be sentenced to less than the minimum mandatory ten-year sentence; and (3) That, contrary to the decision in

State v. Allmond

, it is the expressed intent of the General Assembly that persons who commit a serious violent felony specified in the ‘Sentence Reform Act of 1994’ shall be sentenced to a mandatory term of imprisonment of not less than ten years and shall not be eligible for first offender treatment.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-73/HB310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For review of 1998 legislation relating to penal institutions, see 15 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 197 (1998).

For note, “Can’t Do the Time, Don’t Do the Crime?: Dixon v. State, Statutory Construction, and the
Harsh Realities of Mandatory Minimum Sentencing in Georgia,” see 22 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 519 (2005).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

For annual survey on criminal law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 73 (2017).

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 45 (2018).